District of Columbia statutes.
4-251.03

Eligibility.

(a)

A grandparent may be eligible to receive subsidy payments under this section if:

(1)

The grandparent has been the child’s primary caregiver for at least the previous 6 months.

(2)

The child has resided in the grandparent’s home for at least the previous 6 months;

(3)

The child’s parent has not resided in the grandparent’s home for at least the previous 6 months; provided, that a parent may reside in the home without disqualifying the grandparent from receiving a subsidy if:

(A)

The parent has designated the grandparent to be the child’s standby guardian pursuant to Chapter 48 of Title 16;

(B)

The parent is a minor enrolled in school; or

(C)

The parent is a minor with a medically verifiable disability under criteria that shall be prescribed by the Mayor pursuant to § 4-251.06.

(4)

The grandparent, and all adults residing in the grandparent’s home, has submitted to a criminal background check;

(5)

The grandparent’s household income is under 200 percent of the federally-defined poverty level;

(6)

The grandparent is a resident of the District as defined by § 4-205.03;

(7)

The grandparent has applied for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families benefits for the child;

(8)

The grandparent has entered into a subsidy agreement that includes a provision that no payments received under the agreement shall inure to the benefit of the child’s parent but shall be solely for the benefit of the child;

(8A)

The grandparent is not currently receiving a guardianship or adoption subsidy for the child;

(9)

The grandparent has provided a signed statement, sworn under penalty of perjury, that the information provided to establish eligibility pursuant to this section, or any rules promulgated pursuant to § 4-251.06, is true and accurate to the best belief of the grandparent applicant; and

(10)

The grandparent has met any additional requirements prescribed by the Mayor pursuant to rules issued under § 4-251.06.

(a-1)

The Mayor may waive the eligibility requirements established in subsection (a)(1) and (2) of this section if:

(1)

The Agency determines that the child is at risk of removal from the parent, guardian, or custodian pursuant to § 4-1301.07;

(2)

The parent, guardian, or custodian permits the grandparent to be the child’s primary caregiver; and

(3)

The parent, guardian, or custodian permits the child to reside with the grandparent.

(b)

(1)

The Mayor shall recertify the eligibility of each grandparent receiving a subsidy on at least an annual basis.

(2)

For the purposes of the recertification, a grandparent may be required to provide a signed statement, sworn under penalty of perjury, that the information provided to establish continued eligibility pursuant to this section, or any rules promulgated pursuant to § 4-251.06, remains true and accurate to the best belief of the grandparent.

(c)

(1)

The Mayor shall terminate subsidy payments to a grandparent at any time if:

(A)

The Mayor determines the grandparent no longer meets the eligibility requirements established by this section, or by rules issued under § 4-251.06; or

(B)

There is a substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect against the grandparent caregiver resulting in the removal of the child from the grandparent’s home.

(2)

A grandparent whose subsidy payments are terminated as a result of the removal of the child from the grandparent’s home may reapply if the child has been returned to the grandparent’s home.

(d)

Eligibility for subsidy payments under this section may continue until the child reaches 18 years of age.

(e)

An applicant whose application for a subsidy has been denied or whose subsidy has been terminated shall be entitled to a hearing under the applicable provisions of Chapter 5 of Title 2; provided that a grandparent shall not be entitled to a hearing if the denial or termination of a subsidy is based upon the unavailability of appropriated funds.

(f)

Any statement under this section made with knowledge that the information set forth therein is false shall be subject to prosecution as a false statement under § 22-2405(a).

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-69, § 103, 53 DCR 54
Sept. 20, 2007, D.C. Law 17-21, § 3(a), 54 DCR 6835
Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-261, § 2, 60 DCR 1296

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-251.05.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-21, in subsec. (a), rewrote pars. (1) and (3) and added par. (8A); and added subsec. (f).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-261 added (a-1).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 16-69, § 103a, concerning transfer of subsidy, see § 2(b) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-177, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 21).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 103 of Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-278, February 22, 2006, 53 DCR 1459).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Safe and Stable Homes for Children and Youth Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-69, July 9, 2007, 54 DCR 6826).
For temporary addition of (a-1), see § 2 of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-571, December 20, 2012, 60 DCR 97.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-37, March 19, 2013, 60 DCR 4659, 20 DCSTAT 520).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 16-69, § 103a, concerning transfer of subsidy, see § 2(b) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-508, Dec. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 12717, 20 STAT 4429).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 16-69, § 103a, concerning transfer of subsidy, see § 2(b) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-33, Mar. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 4540, 21 DCSTAT 870).